Texas statutes.
ESTATES CODE

TITLE 3. GUARDIANSHIP AND RELATED PROCEDURES

SUBTITLE G. SPECIAL TYPES OF GUARDIANSHIPS

CHAPTER 1252. GUARDIANSHIPS FOR NONRESIDENT WARDS

SUBCHAPTER A. RESIDENT GUARDIAN OF NONRESIDENT WARD'S ESTATE

Sec. 1252.001. GRANTING OF GUARDIANSHIP OF ESTATE FOR NONRESIDENT. (a) A guardianship of the estate of a nonresident incapacitated person who owns property in this state may be granted, if necessary, in the same manner as for the property of a resident of this state.

(b) A court in the county in which the principal estate of the nonresident incapacitated person is located has jurisdiction to appoint the guardian.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 1252.002. COURT ACTIONS AND ORDERS CONCERNING ESTATE. The court shall take all actions and make all necessary orders with respect to the estate described by Section 1252.001 of a nonresident ward for the maintenance, support, care, or education of the ward out of the proceeds of the estate, in the same manner as if the ward were a resident of this state sent abroad by the court for education or treatment.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 1252.003. CLOSING RESIDENT GUARDIANSHIP. The court shall close a resident guardianship of an estate granted under this subchapter if a qualified nonresident guardian of the estate later qualifies in this state under Section 1252.051 as a nonresident guardian.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

SUBCHAPTER B. NONRESIDENT GUARDIAN OF NONRESIDENT WARD'S ESTATE

Sec. 1252.051. APPOINTMENT AND QUALIFICATION OF NONRESIDENT GUARDIAN. (a) A nonresident of this state may be appointed and qualified as guardian or coguardian of a nonresident ward's estate located in this state in the same manner provided by this title for the appointment and qualification of a resident guardian of the estate of an incapacitated person if:

(1) a court of competent jurisdiction in the geographical jurisdiction in which the nonresident resides appointed the nonresident guardian;

(2) the nonresident is qualified as guardian or as a fiduciary legal representative by any name known in the foreign jurisdiction of the property or estate of the ward located in the jurisdiction of the foreign court; and

(3) the nonresident, with the written application for appointment, files in the county court of a county of this state in which all or part of the nonresident ward's estate is located a complete transcript of the proceedings from the records of the court in which the nonresident applicant was appointed.

(b) The transcript required by Subsection (a)(3) must:

(1) show the applicant's appointment and qualification as guardian or other fiduciary legal representative of the ward's property or estate;

(2) be certified to and attested by the clerk of the foreign court or the court officer charged by law with custody of the court records, under the court seal, if any; and

(3) have attached a certificate of the judge, chief justice, or presiding magistrate of the foreign court certifying that the attestation of the clerk or legal custodian of the court records is in correct form.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 1252.052. APPOINTMENT; ISSUANCE OF LETTERS OF GUARDIANSHIP. (a) If a nonresident applicant meets the requirements of Section 1252.051, without the necessity of notice or citation, the court shall enter an order appointing the nonresident as guardian or coguardian of a nonresident ward's estate located in this state.

(b) After the nonresident applicant qualifies in the manner required of resident guardians and files with the court a power of attorney appointing a resident agent to accept service of process in all actions or proceedings with respect to the estate, the clerk shall issue the letters of guardianship to the nonresident guardian.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 1252.053. INVENTORY AND APPRAISEMENT; ADMINISTRATION OF ESTATE. After qualification, a nonresident guardian:

(1) shall file an inventory and appraisement of the ward's estate in this state subject to the court's jurisdiction, as in ordinary cases; and

(2) is subject to the applicable provisions of this code governing the handling and settlement of an estate by a resident guardian.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 1252.054. DELIVERY OF ESTATE TO CERTAIN GUARDIANS. The court may order a resident guardian who has any of the ward's estate to deliver the estate to a qualified and acting guardian of the ward.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 1252.055. REMOVAL OF WARD'S PROPERTY FROM STATE BY NONRESIDENT GUARDIAN. Regardless of whether qualified under this title, a nonresident guardian may remove personal property of the ward from this state if:

(1) the removal does not conflict with the tenure of the property or the terms of the guardianship under which the property is held; and

(2) all known debts against the estate in this state are paid or secured by a bond payable to and approved by the judge of the court in which guardianship proceedings are pending in this state.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.